North Carolina statutes. Chapter 142. State Debt.
Article 2. Borrowing Money in Emergencies and in Anticipation of Collection of Taxes.

§ 142-16.
Governor and Council of State may borrow on note.

The Governor and Council of State may authorize and empower the State Treasurer in the intervals between sessions of the General Assembly, to borrow money on short term notes to meet any emergency arising from the destruction of the State’s property, whether used by department or institution, or from some unforeseen calamity not amounting to its destruction.

History.

1927, c. 49, s. 1.

§ 142-17.
Recital of facts entered on minutes; directions to Treasurer; limit of amount.

The Council of State, when such emergency arises during such interval, shall recite upon its minutes the facts out of which it does arise, and thereupon direct the State Treasurer to borrow from time to time money needed to meet such emergency or calamity, not exceeding, however in the whole, five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in the aggregate in the period between the adjournment of the present session of the General Assembly and the convening of the General Assembly in regular session in 1929 and not exceeding five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in the aggregate in any succeeding interval between regular sessions of the General Assembly, and to execute in behalf of the State of North Carolina notes for said money so borrowed to run not exceeding two years, and to bear interest not exceeding five percent (5%) per annum, payable semiannually. Said notes shall be in such forms as the State Treasurer may determine, and the obligations for the interest thereupon after maturity shall be receivable in payment of taxes, debts, dues, licenses, fines and demands due the State of any kind whatsoever. The said notes shall be exempt from all State, county and municipal taxation or assessment, direct or indirect, general or special, whether imposed for the purpose of general revenue or otherwise, and the interest thereon shall not be subject to taxation as for income, nor shall said notes be subject to taxation when constituting a part of the surplus of any bank, trust company, or other corporation.

History.

1927, c. 49, s. 2.

§ 142-18.
Report to General Assembly.

At each, the next regular or extra session of the General Assembly, the Governor and Council of State shall report to it the proceedings of the Governor and Council of State in borrowing money under this Article, setting out fully the facts upon which they held that the emergency existed which authorized such borrowing.

History.

1927, c. 49, s. 3.

§ 142-19.
Power given to Director of Budget to authorize State Treasurer to borrow money.

The Director of the Budget by and with the consent of the Governor and Council of State shall have authority to authorize and direct the State Treasurer to borrow, in the name of the State and pledge the credit of the State for the payment thereof, in anticipation of the collection of taxes, such sums as may be necessary to make the payment on appropriations to the various institutions, departments and agencies of the State as even as possible so as to preserve the best interest of the State in the conduct of the various institutions, departments and agencies of the State during each fiscal year.

History.

1927, c. 195.